Washington statutes.
RCW 2.48.040

State bar governed by board of governors.

The state bar shall be governed by the board of governors which shall be charged with the executive functions of the state bar and the enforcement of the provisions of RCW 2.48.010 through 2.48.180 and all rules adopted in pursuance thereof. The members of the board of governors shall receive no salary by virtue of their office.

[ 1933 c 94 s 6; RRS s 138-6.]